Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-151
Materiel administrator; bond or insurance.

Before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, the materiel administrator shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. Neither expiration of term of office nor removal therefrom shall operate as a discharge of the bond or termination of the insurance, but it shall remain in full force and effect as provided by law. The premium shall be paid by the state.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 7, p. 706;

R.S.1943, § 81-151;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 31;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 40.